test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_MascInan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - критерий M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: критерий
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: критерий
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: критерия
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: критерии
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: критерию
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: критерием
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: критерии
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: критерии
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: критериев
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: критериях
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: критериям
      критерий+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: критериями
  Noun - музей M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: музей
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: музей
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: музея
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: музее
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: музею
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: музеем
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: музеи
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: музеи
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: музеев
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: музеях
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: музеям
      музей+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: музеями
  Noun - карандаш M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: карандаш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: карандаш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: карандаша
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: карандаше
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: карандашу
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: карандашом
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: карандаши
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: карандаши
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: карандашей
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: карандашах
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: карандашам
      карандаш+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: карандашами
  Noun - словарь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: словарь
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: словарь
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: словаря
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: словаре
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: словарю
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: [словарём, словарем]
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: словари
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: словари
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: словарей
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: словарях
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: словарям
      словарь+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: словарями
  Noun - язык M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: язык
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: язык
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: языка
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: языке
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: языку
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: языком
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: языки
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: языки
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: языков
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: языках
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: языкам
      язык+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: языками
  Noun - крюк M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: крюк
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: крюк
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: крюка
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: крюке
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc2: крюку
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: крюку
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: крюком
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: [крючья, крюки]
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: [крючья, крюки]
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: [крючьев, крюков]
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: [крючьях, крюках]
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: [крючьям, крюкам]
      крюк+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: [крючьями, крюками]
  Noun - пол M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: пол
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: пол
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen: пола
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc: поле
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Dat: полу
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Ins: полом
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Nom: полы
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Acc: полы
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Gen: полов
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Loc: полах
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Dat: полам
      пол¹+N+Msc+Inan+Pl+Ins: полами
